Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.100

Powers of the authority.

In addition to accomplishing the economic development finance programs specifically authorized in this chapter, the authority may:

(1) Maintain an office or offices;

(2) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded;

(3) Engage consultants, agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract with federal, state, and local governmental entities for services, and hire such employees, agents and other personnel as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(4) Make and execute all manner of contracts, agreements and instruments and financing documents with public and private parties as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(5) Acquire and hold real or personal property, or any interest therein, in the name of the authority, and to sell, assign, lease, encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same in such manner as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(6) Open and maintain accounts in qualified public depositaries and otherwise provide for the investment of any funds not required for immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;

(7) Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions, departments, or agencies of federal, state, or local government;

(8) Procure such insurance in such amounts and from such insurers as the authority deems desirable, including, but not limited to, insurance against any loss or damage to its property or other assets, public liability insurance for injuries to persons or property, and directors and officers liability insurance;

(9) Apply for and accept subventions, grants, loans, advances, and contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other things of value, to be held, used and applied as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(10) Establish guidelines for the participation by eligible banking organizations in programs conducted by the authority under this chapter;

(11) Act as an agent, by agreement, for federal, state, or local governmental entities to carry out the programs authorized in this chapter;

(12) Establish, revise, and collect such fees and charges as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(13) Make such expenditures as are appropriate for paying the administrative costs and expenses of the authority in carrying out the provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, That expenditures with respect to the economic development financing programs of the authority shall not be made from funds of the state;

(14) Establish such reserves and special funds, and controls on deposits to and disbursements from them, as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(15) Give assistance to public bodies by providing information, guidelines, forms, and procedures for implementing their financing programs;

(16) Prepare, publish and distribute, with or without charge, such studies, reports, bulletins, and other material as the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;

(17) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

(18) Adopt rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter; and

(19) Exercise any other power the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes and exercise the powers expressly granted in this chapter.

[ 1990 c 53 s 6; 1989 c 279 s 11.]

NOTES:

Bonds to finance conservation measures: RCW 43.19.695.